District of Columbia statutes.
38-1501

Establishment; financial aid.

(a)

There shall be established in the District of Columbia (“District”) a Nurses Training Corps (“Corps”), which shall provide financial aid to District residents desiring to obtain a Licensed Practical Nurse (“LPN”) certificate or an Associate of Arts degree or a Bachelor of Science degree in nursing.

(b)

The financial aid provided by the Corps shall include tuition and may include the following:

(1)

The reasonable cost of textbooks and supplies;

(2)

The reasonable transportation costs to and from classes;

(3)

The reasonable cost of child care while attending classes; and

(4)

A stipend to help defray the cost of reasonable living expenses for full-time enrolled students.

(c)

In exchange for financial aid, the student shall contract to work for D.C. General Hospital, the Department of Human Services, the Office on Aging, or other District agencies or facilities as designated by the Mayor for a specified number of years after completion of the agreed nursing education.

(d)

The basic criteria for selection to the Corps shall include the following:

(1)

Bona fide residency in the District for 2 years immediately prior to application to the Corps;

(2)

Stated interest in nursing and public service in the field of nursing within the District;

(3)

Financial need; and

(4)

Admission to an accredited program of nursing study within the District.

History

Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-32, § 2, 34 DCR 5312
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 11, 35 DCR 147

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2601.